Washington statutes.
RCW 11.76.080

Representation of incapacitated person by guardian ad litem—Exception.

If there be any alleged incapacitated person interested in the estate who has no legally appointed conservator or limited conservator under RCW 11.130.360, the court:

(1) At any stage of the proceeding in its discretion and for such purpose or purposes as it shall indicate, may appoint; and

(2) For hearings held under RCW 11.54.010, 11.68.041, 11.68.100, and 11.76.050 or for entry of an order adjudicating testacy or intestacy and heirship when no personal representative is appointed to administer the estate of the decedent, shall appoint some disinterested person as guardian ad litem to represent the allegedly incapacitated person with reference to any petition, proceeding report, or adjudication of testacy or intestacy without the appointment of a personal representative to administer the estate of decedent in which the alleged incapacitated person may have an interest, who, on behalf of the alleged incapacitated person, may contest the same as any other person interested might contest it, and who shall be allowed by the court reasonable compensation for his or her services: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That where a surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner is the sole beneficiary under the terms of a will, the court may grant a motion by the personal representative to waive the appointment of a guardian ad litem for a person who is the minor child of the surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner and the decedent and who is incapacitated solely for the reason of his or her being under eighteen years of age.

[ 2020 c 312 s 710; 2008 c 6 s 806; 1997 c 252 s 71; 1977 ex.s. c 80 s 15; 1974 ex.s. c 117 s 45; 1971 c 28 s 1; 1969 c 70 s 4; 1965 c 145 s 11.76.080. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 164; RRS s 1534; prior: Code 1881 s 1558; 1854 p 297 s 180.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2020 c 312: See note following RCW 11.130.915.

Part headings not law—Severability—2008 c 6: See RCW 26.60.900 and 26.60.901.

Application—1997 c 252 ss 1-73: See note following RCW 11.02.005.

Purpose—Intent—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 80: See notes following RCW 4.16.190.

Application, construction—Severability—Effective date—1974 ex.s. c 117: See RCW 11.02.080 and notes following.